Missouri, session 2026, SB1511.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 334.097, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 334.097,
to read as follows:
334.097. 1. Physicians shall maintain an adequate and
complete patient record for each patient and may maintain
electronic records provided the record-keeping format is
capable of being printed for review by the state board of
registration for the healing arts. An adequate and complete
patient record shall include documentation of the following
information:
(1) Identification of the patient, including name,
birthdate, address and telephone number;
(2) The date or dates the patient was seen;
(3) The current status of the patient, including the
reason for the visit;
(4) Observation of pertinent physical findings;
(5) Assessment and clinical impression of diagnosis;
(6) Plan for care and treatment, or additional
consultations or diagnostic testing, if necessary. If
treatment includes medication, the physician shall include

SB 1511 2
in the patient record the medication and dosage of any
medication prescribed, dispensed or administered;
(7) Any informed consent for office procedures; and
(8) If requested to be documented by the patient, any
question asked related to the care and treatment of the
patient and the physician's response to such question.
2. Patient records remaining under the care, custody
and control of the licensee shall be maintained by the
licensee of the board, or the licensee's designee, for a
minimum of seven years from the date of when the last
professional service was provided.
3. Any correction, addition or change in any patient
record made more than forty-eight hours after the final
entry is entered in the record and signed by the physician
shall be clearly marked and identified as such, and the
date, time and name of the person making the correction,
addition or change shall be included, as well as the reason
for the correction, addition or change.
4. A consultative report shall be considered an
adequate medical record for a radiologist, pathologist or a
consulting physician.
5. The board shall not initiate disciplinary action
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 334.100 against a
licensee solely based on a violation of this section. If
the board initiates disciplinary action against the licensee
for any reason other than a violation of this section, the
board may allege violation of this section as an additional
cause for discipline pursuant to subdivision (6) of
subsection 2 of section 334.100.
6. The board shall not obtain a patient medical record
without written authorization from the patient to obtain the

SB 1511 3
medical record or the issuance of a subpoena for the patient
medical record.
✓